Illinois, session 104th, HB5237.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by changing 5Section 5-1009 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1009)  (from Ch. 34, par. 5-1009)7    Sec. 5-1009. Limitation on home rule powers. Except as 8provided in Sections 5-1006, 5-1006.5, 5-1006.8, 5-1006.9, 95-1007, and 5-1008, on and after September 1, 1990, no home 10rule county has the authority to impose, pursuant to its home 11rule authority, a retailers' occupation tax, service 12occupation tax, use tax, sales tax, or other tax on the use, 13sale, or purchase of tangible personal property based on the 14gross receipts from such sales or the selling or purchase 15price of said tangible personal property. Notwithstanding the 16foregoing, this Section does not preempt any home rule imposed 17tax such as the following: (1) a tax on alcoholic beverages, 18whether based on gross receipts, volume sold, or any other 19measurement; (2) a tax based on the number of units of 20cigarettes or tobacco products; (3) a tax, however measured, 21based on the use of a hotel or motel room or similar facility; 22(4) a tax, however measured, on the sale or transfer of real 23property; (5) a tax, however measured, on lease receipts; (6)   HB5237- 2 -LRB104 17282 HLH 30704 b1a tax on food prepared for immediate consumption and on 2alcoholic beverages sold by a business which provides for on 3premise consumption of said food or alcoholic beverages; or 4(7) other taxes not based on the selling or purchase price or 5gross receipts from the use, sale, or purchase of tangible 6personal property. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, 7a home rule county may not impose a tax on businesses 8calculated based on the number of employees of the business. 9This Section does not preempt a home rule county from imposing 10a tax, however measured, on the use, for consideration, of a 11parking lot, garage, or other parking facility. 12    On and after December 1, 2019, no home rule county has the 13authority to impose, pursuant to its home rule authority, a 14tax, however measured, on sales of aviation fuel, as defined 15in Section 3 of the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, unless the 16tax revenue is expended for airport-related purposes. For 17purposes of this Section, "airport-related purposes" has the 18meaning ascribed in Section 6z-20.2 of the State Finance Act. 19Aviation fuel shall be excluded from tax only for so long as 20the revenue use requirements of 49 U.S.C. 47017(b) and 49 21U.S.C. 47133 are binding on the county. 22    This Section is a limitation, pursuant to subsection (g) 23of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution, on 24the power of home rule units to tax. The changes made to this 25Section by Public Act 101-10 are a denial and limitation of 26home rule powers and functions under subsection (g) of Section   HB5237- 3 -LRB104 17282 HLH 30704 b16 of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution. 2(Source: P.A. 103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 3    Section 10. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 4changing Section 8-11-6a as follows: 5    (65 ILCS 5/8-11-6a)  (from Ch. 24, par. 8-11-6a)6    Sec. 8-11-6a. Home rule municipalities; preemption of 7certain taxes. Except as provided in Sections 8-11-1, 8-11-5, 88-11-6, 8-11-6b, 8-11-6c, 8-11-23, 8-11-24, and 11-74.3-6 on 9and after September 1, 1990, no home rule municipality has the 10authority to impose, pursuant to its home rule authority, a 11retailer's occupation tax, service occupation tax, use tax, 12sales tax or other tax on the use, sale or purchase of tangible 13personal property based on the gross receipts from such sales 14or the selling or purchase price of said tangible personal 15property. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this Section does not 16preempt any home rule imposed tax such as the following: (1) a 17tax on alcoholic beverages, whether based on gross receipts, 18volume sold or any other measurement; (2) a tax based on the 19number of units of cigarettes or tobacco products (provided, 20however, that a home rule municipality that has not imposed a 21tax based on the number of units of cigarettes or tobacco 22products before July 1, 1993, shall not impose such a tax after 23that date); (3) a tax, however measured, based on the use of a 24hotel or motel room or similar facility; (4) a tax, however   HB5237- 4 -LRB104 17282 HLH 30704 b1measured, on the sale or transfer of real property; (5) a tax, 2however measured, on lease receipts; (6) a tax on food 3prepared for immediate consumption and on alcoholic beverages 4sold by a business which provides for on premise consumption 5of said food or alcoholic beverages; or (7) other taxes not 6based on the selling or purchase price or gross receipts from 7the use, sale or purchase of tangible personal property. 8Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a home rule 9municipality may not impose a tax on businesses calculated 10based on the number of employees of the business. This Section 11does not preempt a home rule municipality with a population of 12more than 2,000,000 from imposing a tax, however measured, on 13the use, for consideration, of a parking lot, garage, or other 14parking facility. This Section is not intended to affect any 15existing tax on food and beverages prepared for immediate 16consumption on the premises where the sale occurs, or any 17existing tax on alcoholic beverages, or any existing tax 18imposed on the charge for renting a hotel or motel room, which 19was in effect January 15, 1988, or any extension of the 20effective date of such an existing tax by ordinance of the 21municipality imposing the tax, which extension is hereby 22authorized, in any non-home rule municipality in which the 23imposition of such a tax has been upheld by judicial 24determination, nor is this Section intended to preempt the 25authority granted by Public Act 85-1006. On and after December 261, 2019, no home rule municipality has the authority to   HB5237- 5 -LRB104 17282 HLH 30704 b1impose, pursuant to its home rule authority, a tax, however 2measured, on sales of aviation fuel, as defined in Section 3 of 3the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act, unless the tax is not 4subject to the revenue use requirements of 49 U.S.C. 47107(b) 5and 49 U.S.C. 47133, or unless the tax revenue is expended for 6airport-related purposes. For purposes of this Section, 7"airport-related purposes" has the meaning ascribed in Section 86z-20.2 of the State Finance Act. Aviation fuel shall be 9excluded from tax only if, and for so long as, the revenue use 10requirements of 49 U.S.C. 47107(b) and 49 U.S.C. 47133 are 11binding on the municipality. This Section is a limitation, 12pursuant to subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the 13Illinois Constitution, on the power of home rule units to tax. 14The changes made to this Section by Public Act 101-10 are a 15denial and limitation of home rule powers and functions under 16subsection (g) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 17Constitution. 18(Source: P.A. 103-781, eff. 8-5-24.) 19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.